Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 13
CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT ACT

Cross references:

For administrative procedure for child support and enforcement, see article 13.5 of this title; for support proceedings under the "Colorado Children's Code", see article 6 of title 19; for reciprocal support, see article 5 of title 14; for nonsupport, see article 6 of title 14; for support proceedings under the "Colorado Child Support Enforcement Procedures Act", see article 14 of title 14.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

hild Support Enforcement Remedies Available Through

C

hild Support Enforcement Agencies", see 33 Colo. Law. 57 (Jan. 2004).

Section

26-13-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Child Support Enforcement Act".

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 640, § 5, effective June 7.

26-13-102. Legislative declaration.

The purposes of this article are to provide for enforcing the support obligations owed by obligors, to locate obligors, to establish parentage, to establish and modify child support obligations, and to obtain support in cooperation with the federal government pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, and other applicable federal regulations.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 640, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 282, § 7, effective April 2.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 599, § 35, effective July 10.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1653, § 11, effective May 31.

26-13-102.5. Definitions.

As used in this article 13, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Delegate child support enforcement unit" means the unit of a county department of human or social services or its contractual agent that is responsible for carrying out the provisions of this article 13. The term contractual agent includes a private child support collection agency, operating as an independent contractor with a county department of human or social services, that contracts to provide any services that the delegate child support enforcement unit is required by law to provide.

"IV-D case" or "IV-D support order" means a case or a support order with respect to a child in which support enforcement services are provided, in accordance with Title IV-D of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, and pursuant to this article, by the delegate child support enforcement unit to a custodian of a child who is or was a recipient:

Of aid to families with dependent children, as that program was in effect as of July 16, 1996;

Under the Colorado works program pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of this title;

Of medical assistance only under articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.;

Of Title IV-E foster care; or

Of foster care services under article 5 of this title.

The terms "IV-D case" or "IV-D support order" also include any case or order in which the custodian of a child applies to the delegate child support enforcement unit for support enforcement services and pays a fee for such services under section 26-13-106 (2).

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1407, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1270, § 62, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 2019, § 107, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 317, § 14, effective April 15.

L. 2018:

IP and (1) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 451, § 135, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-13-102.7. Privacy - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that while it is beneficial to the children of the state of Colorado to have procedures by which to enhance the establishment and enforcement of child support, some of which may include the collection and transmission of certain informational data by electronic and other means, the general assembly also determines that it is equally important to prevent abuses of personal information and to safeguard the fundamental right of individuals to privacy. To ensure the privacy of individuals against whom child support is to be established or enforced or on whose behalf it is to be collected, the general assembly hereby determines that it is appropriate that certain safeguards be established.

In addition to any other confidentiality provisions set forth in this article and section 14-14-113, C.R.S., the child support enforcement agency and the delegate child support enforcement units, when exercising authority pursuant to this article and section 14-14-113, C.R.S., to establish, modify, or enforce support obligations, shall make every effort to preserve the integrity and confidentiality of the informational data obtained from other sources about the support obligor and obligee and the informational data provided to any other source about such individuals. The child support enforcement agency and the delegate child support enforcement units shall share only the minimum amount of information required by law and by means that are most capable of preserving the integrity and confidentiality of the information or data about the individual. Specifically, the informational data maintained or transmitted pursuant to this article shall be:

Processed fairly and lawfully;

Collected for specified, explicit, and legitimate purposes as provided by statute or rule and not further processed in a way incompatible with those purposes;

Adequate, relevant, and not excessive in relation to the purposes for which such information is collected or processed;

Accurate and, where necessary, kept up to date to the maximum extent feasible; and

Kept in a form that permits identification of the subject of such information for no longer than is necessary for the purposes for which the information was collected or for which it was processed.

In addition, an individual about whom information is gathered or transmitted pursuant to this article or section 14-14-113, C.R.S., shall have the right to access such information relating to him or her in order to verify the accuracy of the information and the lawfulness of the processing of such information.

Any individual about whom information is gathered or transmitted pursuant to this article or section 14-14-113, C.R.S., shall be entitled to civil damages in a court of law against any person or entity who knowingly violates the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1288, § 33, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

26-13-102.8. Nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances.

If a party alleges in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of specific identifying information, that information shall be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or the public. A party seeking disclosure of all or part of such identifying information may request a hearing before the court. After a hearing in which the court takes into consideration the health, safety, or liberty of the party or child, the court shall make findings based upon the considerations specified in this section and may order disclosure of all or part of the information if the court determines the disclosure to be in the interest of justice.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 387, § 5, effective July 1.

26-13-103. Support enforcement program.

The state department, pursuant to rules and regulations, shall establish a program to provide necessary support enforcement services. The state department shall establish a single and separate agency within the department to administer or supervise the administration of such program in accordance with Title IV-D of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, and this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 641, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 282, § 8, effective April 2.

26-13-104. State plan.

The state department shall prepare and submit to the United States secretary of health and human services a state plan and any amendments to such state plan that become necessary which meet the requirements of Title IV-D of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 641, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 282, § 9, effective April 2.

26-13-105. Child support enforcement services - review.

Subject to the provisions of section 26-13-104, the child support enforcement program shall include the following, as required by federal law:

The establishment and modification of an obligor parent's legal obligation to support his or her dependent children, including determination of parentage when necessary;

The location of an obligor parent or putative parent;

The monitoring and processing of an obligor parent's child support and maintenance payment;

The enforcement of an obligor parent's support obligation as set forth in section 26-13-106 (1);

Any necessary investigative and administrative activities which may be necessary to accomplish the services required by this section;

Annual reviews of the child support enforcement program, to be conducted by the state department, including all information as may be necessary to measure the state's compliance with federal requirements.

The state department shall review the cost associated with conducting the annual reviews required in this paragraph (f) and the number of full-time equivalent employees (FTE) of the state department required to complete the reviews. The state department shall examine and evaluate the feasibility and cost-effectiveness of privatizing this function.

The number of full-time equivalent employees (FTE) necessitated by the implementation of each new provision contained in House Bill 97-1205 at both the state and county levels; and

Such additional data as may be necessary.

(1.5) Upon the request of another state, the state department or its agent is authorized to provide the identification, through data matches with any entity where assets may be found, of assets owned by a person who owes child support in another state and to seize such assets through levy or other appropriate processes.

In any action brought pursuant to this article, or any action brought by a governmental agency, to establish, modify, or enforce a child support obligation or to enforce a maintenance obligation as set forth in section 26-13-106, the prosecuting attorney represents the people of the state of Colorado. Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify statutory mandate, authority, or confidentiality required of any governmental agency, nor should representation by a prosecuting attorney be construed to create an attorney-client relationship between the attorney and any party, other than the people of the state of Colorado, or witness to the action; except that any district attorney or county attorney as contractual agent for a county department shall collect a fee pursuant to section 26-13-106 (2).

In addition to the annual review required by paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section, or as a part of such review, the state department shall evaluate the cost and effectiveness of each of the provisions implemented by House Bill 97-1205. Such evaluation shall include a review of the following:

(I) The amount of increase in support collection, if any, associated with the implementation of each new provision contained in House Bill 97-1205;

(II) The cost, in federal, state, and county dollars, associated with the implementation of each new provision set forth in House Bill 97-1205;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2001, p. 1172, § 10, effective August 8, 2001.)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 641, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 81:

(2) added, p. 902, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 82:

(1)(c), (1)(d), and (2) amended, p. 282, § 10, effective April 2.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 599, § 36, effective July 10.

L. 88:

(2) amended, p. 635, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 255, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1543, § 19, effective May 31.

L. 97:

(1)(f) and (3) added, p. 1289, §§ 34, 35, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(f)(II), (3)(a)(IV), and (3)(b) amended, p. 1172, § 10, effective August 8.

L. 2012:

(1.5) added, (SB 12-042), ch. 30, p. 121, § 1, effective March 19.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) was originally numbered as subsection (2) in House Bill 97-1205 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

26-13-106. Eligibility for services - child support DRA fee cash fund.

Support enforcement services shall be provided to those recipients of medicaid-only and Title IV-E foster care as required by federal law and to participants in the Colorado works program implemented pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of this title who, as a condition of eligibility pursuant to federal law, must assign their rights to support to, and cooperate with, the state department in the establishment, modification, and enforcement of support obligations owed by obligors to their children and the enforcement of maintenance owed by obligors to their spouses or former spouses.

Child support establishment, modification, and enforcement services under state law and under the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act", article 5 of title 14, C.R.S., shall be provided to any person who completes a written application and pays the required fee; except that the county may elect to pay the fee out of county child support enforcement funds. The state department shall establish, by rule, a fee to be charged for services provided under this section. Such fee shall be applied toward reimbursing expenditures incurred by the child support enforcement program. County departments and their contractual agents for legal services, including district and county attorneys, may pursue such fee, notwithstanding any other provision of law. Nonpayment of any fee charged by the state department for services provided under this section shall not be the basis for any criminal prosecution or order of contempt of the court.

The county department may recover any costs incurred in excess of fees from the obligor in a case in which an individual is receiving child support enforcement services under subsection (2) of this section.

After more than five hundred fifty dollars has been collected from an obligor during a year, the county department shall recover a fee of thirty-five dollars from the obligee if the obligee has never received public assistance. The county department shall withhold the fee from the first amount collected that exceeds the five-hundred-fifty-dollar threshold.

There is created in the state treasury the child support DRA fee cash fund, referred to in this subsection (5) as the "fund". The fund consists of money credited to the fund from the state share, if any, of fees collected pursuant to this section and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the state department may expend money from the fund for program operations.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 641, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 283, § 11, effective April 2.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 599, § 37, effective July 10.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 893, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 614, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 563, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 757, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended and (4) added, p. 1653, § 12, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(4) amended and (5) added, (HB 19-1215), ch. 270, p. 2553, § 5, effective July 1.

26-13-107. State parent locator service - definitions.

There shall be established in the state department a state parent locator service to assist delegate child support enforcement units or their authorized agents, other states, and agencies of the federal government in the location of parents who have or appear to have abandoned children who qualify under section 26-13-106.

To effectuate the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the executive director may request and shall receive from departments, boards, bureaus, or other agencies of the state, including but not limited to law enforcement agencies, or any of its political subdivisions, and the same are authorized to provide, such assistance and data as will enable the state department and delegate child support enforcement units or their authorized agents properly to carry out their powers and duties to locate such parents for the purpose of establishing parentage or establishing, modifying, or enforcing child support obligations. In addition, any federal agency or such agency's authorized agents properly carrying out their powers and duties to locate a parent for the purpose of establishing parentage or establishing, modifying, or enforcing child support obligations may request and shall have access to any motor vehicle or law enforcement system used by the state to locate an individual. Any records established pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be available only to the following:

Any state or local agency or official seeking to collect child support under the state plan or the agency's or official's authorized agents;

The attorney general, district attorneys, and county attorneys;

Courts having jurisdiction in support or abandonment proceedings or actions to establish child support against a parent or to issue an order against a parent for the allocation of parental responsibilities or parenting time rights or any agent of such court;

The obligee parent, legal guardian, attorney, or agent of a child who is not receiving aid under Title IV-A of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, when a court order is provided; and

United States agents or attorneys for use with the federal parent locator service in connection with a parental kidnapping or child custody case, as authorized by federal law.

All departments and agencies of the state and local governments, including but not limited to law enforcement agencies, shall cooperate in the location of parents who have abandoned or deserted children who qualify under section 26-13-106; and, on request of a delegate child support enforcement unit or its authorized agent, the state department, or the district attorney of any judicial district in this state, they shall supply any information on hand, notwithstanding any other provisions of law making such information confidential, concerning:
(3) (a) (I) All departments and agencies of the state and local governments, including but not limited to law enforcement agencies, shall cooperate in the location of parents who have abandoned or deserted children who qualify under section 26-13-106; and, on request of a delegate child support enforcement unit or its authorized agent, the state department, or the district attorney of any judicial district in this state, they shall supply any information on hand, notwithstanding any other provisions of law making such information confidential, concerning:

The location of any individual, including the individual's social security number, most recent address, and the name, address, and employer identification number of the individual's employer, or facilitating the discovery of such individual's location, who is under an obligation to pay child support, against whom such an obligation is sought, or to whom such an obligation is owed;

The individual's wages or other income from employment and any benefits of employment, including any right to or enrollment in group health-care coverage; and

The type, status, location, and amount of any assets of, or debts owed by or to, any such individual.

The department of revenue shall furnish, at no cost to inquiring departments and agencies, such information as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article. Any information so provided may be transmitted to those persons or entities specified in paragraph (a.5) of this subsection (3). The procedures whereby this information will be requested and provided shall be established pursuant to rules and regulations of the state department. The state department and delegate child support enforcement units shall use such information only for the purposes of administering child support enforcement under this title, and the district attorney shall use it only for the purpose of establishing parentage or establishing, modifying, or enforcing child support obligations. The state department and delegate child support enforcement units shall not use the information, or disclose it, for any other purpose. Any violation or misuse of this information will be subject to any civil or criminal penalties provided by law.

Courts having jurisdiction in support and abandonment proceedings or actions to establish child support against a parent or to issue an order against a parent for the allocation of parental responsibilities or parenting time rights or any agent of such court;

The obligee parent, legal guardian, attorney, or agent of a child who is not receiving aid under Title IV-A of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, when a court order is provided;

United States agents or attorneys for use with the federal parent locator service in connection with a parental kidnapping or child custody case, as authorized by federal law; and

The court when a court order is provided from a parent seeking to enforce a child custody, parental responsibilities, or parenting time order.

The state parent locator service shall only accept applications from and transmit Colorado and federal parent locator information to:

(I) Any state or local agency or official seeking to collect child support under the state plan or the agency's or official's authorized agents;

(II) The attorney general, district attorneys, and county attorneys;

Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to compel the disclosure of information relating to a deserting parent who is a recipient of aid under a public assistance program for which federal aid is paid to this state, if such information is required to be kept confidential by the federal law or regulations relating to such program, or to compel the disclosure of any information disclosed in any document, report, or return made confidential by section 39-21-113, C.R.S.

The state parent locator service or the equivalent of a state child support enforcement agency or delegate child support enforcement unit of any other state may initiate a request requiring any employer, trustee, payer of funds, or other employer located within this state or doing business in this state to provide any information on the employment, compensation, and benefits of any individual for whom information is known. Compliance with such a request shall not subject the employer, trustee, or payer of funds to liability to the obligor for disclosing such information without a subpoena pursuant to this paragraph (c). The state department shall not use the provisions of this paragraph (c) for the information-gathering purposes of the financial institution data match system required by section 26-13-128.

The state parent locator service or a delegate child support enforcement unit may obtain information from credit bureaus on the whereabouts, income, and assets of individuals pursuant to the provisions of the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act" in order to provide the services set forth in section 26-13-105.

The state parent locator service or a delegate child support enforcement unit may initiate a request requiring any person located within this state or doing business in this state who is in possession or control of personal property or information concerning the location, benefits, income, and assets of parents with a child support obligation to provide such information to the requesting agency. Compliance with such request shall not subject the holder to liability to the obligor for disclosing such information without a subpoena pursuant to this paragraph (e).

The state parent locator service may initiate an administrative subpoena requiring any public employee retirement benefit plan or financial institution located within this state or doing business in this state that is in possession or control of personal property or information concerning the location, benefits, income, and assets of a person who owes or is owed an obligation for child support debt, retroactive child support, or child support arrearages or against whom an obligation is sought to provide such information to the requesting agency. Compliance with such subpoena shall not subject the public employee retirement benefit plan or the financial institution to liability to the parent for disclosing such information.

The state parent locator service or the equivalent of a state child support enforcement agency or delegate child support enforcement unit of any other state is authorized to issue an administrative subpoena to gather financial or other information to establish, modify, or enforce a support order. An administrative subpoena is authorized to be issued to a public utility for records pertaining to individuals who owe or are owed child support or against or with respect to whom a support obligation is sought. Such subpoena shall require the public utility to furnish documentation providing the names and addresses of these individuals and the names and addresses of the employers of such individuals as appearing in the customer records of the public utility. A public utility responding to an administrative subpoena request shall be entitled to collect a reasonable fee for the processing of each such subpoena.
(f) (I) (A) The state parent locator service or the equivalent of a state child support enforcement agency or delegate child support enforcement unit of any other state is authorized to issue an administrative subpoena to gather financial or other information to establish, modify, or enforce a support order. An administrative subpoena is authorized to be issued to a public utility for records pertaining to individuals who owe or are owed child support or against or with respect to whom a support obligation is sought. Such subpoena shall require the public utility to furnish documentation providing the names and addresses of these individuals and the names and addresses of the employers of such individuals as appearing in the customer records of the public utility. A public utility responding to an administrative subpoena request shall be entitled to collect a reasonable fee for the processing of each such subpoena.

In seeking information from a public utility, as defined in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (f), the state parent locator service shall be subject to the confidentiality requirements and restrictions set forth in section 631 of the federal "Cable Communications Policy Act of 1984", 47 U.S.C. sec. 551.

The provisions of this section shall in no way alter the method of regulation or deregulation of telecommunications service as set forth in article 15 of title 40, C.R.S.

For purposes of this section, "public utility" means any gas corporation, electrical corporation, telegraph corporation, water corporation, rural electric association, municipal electric systems, person, or municipality that operates for the purpose of supplying gas, electricity, telegraph services, or water to the public for domestic, mechanical, or public uses and that is subject to regulation by the public utilities commission under articles 1 to 7 of title 40, C.R.S., and any telephone corporation, municipal telephone entity, or other corporation that offers telecommunications services to the public that is subject to the provisions of article 15 of title 40, C.R.S., and any corporation that provides cable television services to the public.

The child support enforcement agency shall make every reasonable effort to accommodate those entities to which the child support enforcement agency directs an administrative subpoena, if the requirements of this section would pose a hardship on those entities.

The state parent locator service may establish fees to be charged for the provision of services in paragraphs (d) and (e) of subsection (2) of this section and in subparagraphs (IV) and (V) of paragraph (a.5) of subsection (3) of this section.

This section shall apply to all child support obligations ordered as a part of any proceeding, regardless of when the order was entered.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 641, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 283, § 12, effective April 2.

L. 86:

(3)(c) added, p. 729, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3)(c) amended, p. 256, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3)(d) added, p. 1543, § 20, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(2) and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 615, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1), IP(2), (2)(c), (3)(a), (3)(a.5), (3)(c), and (3)(e) amended and (3)(e.5), (3)(f), and (3)(g) added, p. 1290, § 36, effective July 1; (5) added, p. 563, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(c), (3)(a)(I), (3)(c), and (3)(f)(I)(A) amended, p. 757, § 9, effective July 1; (2)(c), (2)(d), (3)(a.5)(III), (3)(a.5)(IV), and (3)(a.5)(VI) amended, p. 1413, § 80, effective February 1, 1999.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (2)(c) by Senate Bill 98-139 and House Bill 98-1183 were harmonized, effective February 1, 1999.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending subsection (1), the introductory portion to subsection (2), and subsections (2)(c), (3)(a), (3)(a.5), (3)(c), and (3)(e) and enacting subsection (3)(e.5), (3)(f), and (3)(g), see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

26-13-108. Recovery of public assistance paid for child support and maintenance - interest collected on support obligations - designation in annual general appropriations act.

Whenever the state department, a county department or its authorized agent, or a district attorney recovers any amounts of support for public assistance recipients, such amounts shall be deposited in the county social services fund, and, if such support is used to reimburse public assistance paid in accordance with federal law, the federal government is entitled to a share in accordance with applicable federal law, the county is entitled to a share in accordance with state law, and the state is entitled to the remaining share. The state may redirect all or a portion of the state's share to the county pursuant to section 26-13-112.5. The general assembly shall designate in a footnote in the annual general appropriations act the portion of the state's share that is redirected to the counties. Costs and expenses reasonably and necessarily incurred by the office of district or county attorney, as contractual agent for a county department, in carrying out the provisions of this article 13 must be billed to county departments of human or social services or a county department of human or social services within the judicial district for the actual cost of services provided. Each county shall make an annual accounting to the state department on all amounts recovered.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 1294, § 37, effective July 1, 1997.)

Effective July 1, 2000, through December 31, 2016, a county may pay families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families, pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of this title, an amount that is equal to the state and county share of child support collections as described in subsection (1) of this section. Such payments shall not be considered income for the purpose of grant calculation. However, such income shall be considered income for purposes of determining eligibility. If a county chooses to pay child support collections directly to a family that is eligible for temporary assistance for needy families, pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of this title, the county shall report such payments to the state department for the month in which the payments are made and shall indicate the choice of this option in its performance contract for Colorado works.

Except as provided in section 26-2-108 (1)(b)(II)(B), effective January 1, 2017, a county shall pay families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families, pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of this title, an amount that is equal to the amount of current child support collections as described in subsection (1) of this section. Such payments shall not be considered income for purposes of calculating the basic cash assistance grant pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of this title. However, such payments, with applicable disregards, shall be considered income for purposes of determining eligibility. The county shall report to the state department the amount of the child support payments for the month in which the payments are made.

The state department shall annually report to the joint budget committee the amount of child support collected and paid by the counties to families that are eligible for temporary assistance for needy families, pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of this title.

Any interest collected on support obligations pursuant to the "Colorado Child Support Enforcement Procedures Act", article 14 of title 14, C.R.S., which support obligations were due to recipients receiving assistance under the Colorado works program, as described in part 7 of article 2 of this title, shall be deposited in the county social services fund and shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 642, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 283, § 13, effective April 2.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 1411, § 4, effective June 8.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 211, § 15, effective August 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1294, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 1711, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4) added, p. 1271, § 63, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1349, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-113), ch. 33, p. 128, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(3) amended, (SB 15-012), ch. 285, p. 1155, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 452, § 136, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-13-109. Enforcement of support UIFSA.

The state department shall be the state information agency for the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act", article 5 of title 14, C.R.S., in this state and reciprocal laws of other states; and, in this capacity, the state department shall:

Assist county departments and other agencies to carry out their responsibilities, powers, and duties to establish and enforce the liability of parents for the support of their minor children;

Aid in the location of deserting parents through the operation of the state parent locator service established in section 26-13-107, obtain and transmit pertinent information and data from public officials and agencies, and assist in the training of local personnel employed to locate such parents;

Stimulate and encourage cooperation, through the holding of meetings and the exchange of information, between and among public officials, law enforcement agencies, and courts having powers and duties relating to the enforcement of the liability of parents for the support of their minor children, including cooperation with public officials, agencies, and courts of other states and the federal government, and, upon request or when required to do so by other provisions of law, advise such officials, agencies, and courts in the exercise of such powers or in the performance of such duties;

Develop, or assist in the development of, appropriate forms, guides, manuals, handbooks, and other materials which may be necessary or useful effectively to accomplish the objectives of this section;

Adopt any rules and regulations which may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 643, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 82:

(1)(a) amended, p. 284, § 14, effective April 2.

L. 93:

IP(1) amended, p. 1606, § 10, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

The substantive provisions of this section prior to 1979 were contained in § 26-1-113.

26-13-110. Federal requirements.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the state department from complying with federal requirements for the child support enforcement program expressly provided by Title IV-D of the "Social Security Act", as amended, in order for the state to qualify for federal funds under such act and to maintain said program within the limits of available appropriations.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 643, § 5, effective June 7.